District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.153

Expenditures from Fund.

(a)

Funding for an approved capital project may be provided through redirection in an approved budget and financial plan or through a reprogramming, pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 47.

(b)

Within 30 days of a request by the Mayor to reprogram the money in the Fund to an approved capital project, the Chief Financial Officer shall certify that the funds are available and the expenditure to support the project is in compliance with this part.

Mar. 3, 2010, D.C. Law 18-111, § 1263, 57 DCR 181
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 8042(c), 62 DCR 10905
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 21-36 deleted the former second sentence in (b), which read “If a project is to receive funds from both the Bond Account and the Non-Bond Account, the Chief Financial Officer shall also certify the amount to be funded from each account.”
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1043 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-187, August 26, 2009, 56 DCR 7374).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1263 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 1263 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 8042(c) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).